Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB377.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 41.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) As used in this section, "central bank digital currency":
1. Means a digital currency, digital medium of exchange, or digital
monetary unit of account that is:
a. Issued and made directly available to the public; or
b. Processed and validated;
by the United States Federal Reserve System, a federal agency, or a
foreign government; and
2. Does not include a digital asset that is:
a. Backed by legal tender or government treasuries; and
b. Issued by a qualified entity.
(b) As used in paragraph (a) of this subsection, "qualified entity" means an
entity that is not:
1. The United States Federal Reserve System;
2. A federal agency;
3. A foreign government; or
4. An instrumentality or agent of an entity referenced in subparagraph
1., 2., or 3. of this paragraph.
(2) Unless otherwise expressly provided by law, no receipts from any source of state
money or money for which the state is responsible shall be held, used, or deposited
in any personal or special bank account, temporarily or otherwise, by any agent or
employee of any budget unit, to meet expenditures or for any other purpose.
(3)[(2)] (a) All receipts of any character of any budget unit, all revenue collected for
the state, and all public money and dues to the state shall be deposited in state
depositories in the most prompt and cost-efficient manner available.
Page 1 of 21
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1400
(b) However, in the case of state departments or agencies located outside
Frankfort, and all state institutions, the Finance and Administration Cabinet
may permit temporary deposits to be made to the accounts maintained by the
agency, department, or institution in a state depository for a period not to
exceed thirty (30) days, and may require that the money be forwarded to the
State Treasury at the time and in the manner and form prescribed by the
cabinet.
(c) [Nothing in ]This section shall not be construed as authorizing any
representative of any agency, department, or institution to enforce or cash,
even for the purpose of a deposit, any check or other instrument of value
payable to the Commonwealth or any agency thereof.
(4)[(3)] Each agency depositing its receipts directly with the State Treasurer shall do
so in the manner approved by the State Treasurer as agent in charge of public fund
deposits.
(5)[(4)] (a) The Department of Revenue may deposit receipts to the credit of the
State Treasury directly with a state depository utilized by the Commonwealth
for its primary banking services.
(b) 1. The State Treasurer, with the approval of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet, may authorize other agencies to deposit receipts
directly with a state depository to the credit of the State Treasury if the
Treasurer prescribes the manner in which the deposit is to be made, and
the forms and reports to be filed with the Treasury Department.
2. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall prescribe the forms and
reports to be filed with it when this type of deposit is made.
(6)[(5)] Each department, agency, or other budget unit which receives funds to be
deposited into the State Treasury shall maintain records to report adequately each
amount received, from whom received, and date received. Agency records shall be
Page 2 of 21
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1400
easily reconcilable with the information forwarded to the State Treasurer.
(7) A department, agency, or other budget unit, including the State Treasurer, shall
not:
(a) Accept central bank digital currency as a method of payment to the
department, agency, budget unit, or State Treasury; or
(b) Require a payment be made to the department, agency, budget unit, or State
Treasury using a central bank digital currency.
Section 2. KRS 45.345 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "central bank digital currency" has the same meaning as
in Section 1 of this Act.
(2) In addition to any payment method authorized by law[,] and notwithstanding any
statute to the contrary, except as otherwise provided in this section and Section 1
of this Act, any state agency may accept the following methods of payment to
secure funds for deposit into the State Treasury:
(a) Credit card;
(b) Debit card;
(c) Electronic check;
(d) Automated clearinghouse (ACH) debit; or
(e) Any other electronic payment method upon the prior written approval of both
the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the Office of the State Treasurer.
(3)[(2)] Any fees charged to a state agency by the provider of the payment services
listed in subsection (1) of this section shall be deemed to represent collection
expenses and may be considered normal operating expenses of the agency, or the
agency may collect convenience fees from users to supplement agency costs of
delivering services.
(4) A state agency shall not, either directly or through any of the methods listed in
subsection (2)(a), (b), (c), or (d) of this section or through another method, accept
Page 3 of 21
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1400
central bank digital currency as payment to secure funds for deposit into the State
Treasury or for any other purpose.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Central bank digital currency" has the same meaning as Section 1 of this
Act; and
(b) "Local government authority":
1. Means any city, county, charter county government, urban-county
government, consolidated local government, unified local government,
public school district, public institution of education, special district,
or municipal corporation, of this state; and
2. Includes any agency, authority, board, bureau, department,
commission, council, committee, instrumentality, or other entity, of an
entity referenced in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph.
(2) A local government authority shall not:
(a) Accept central bank digital currency as a method of payment to the local
government authority; or
(b) Require a payment be made to the local government authority using a
central bank digital currency.
SECTION 4. KRS CHAPTER 355A IS ESTABLISHED AND A NEW
SECTION THEREOF IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) "Digital asset" means a representation of economic, proprietary, or access
rights that is:
1. Stored in a computer readable format; and
2. Either:
Page 4 of 21
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1400
a. A digital consumer asset;
b. A digital security; or
c. Virtual currency;
(b) "Digital consumer asset":
1. Means a digital asset that is used or bought primarily for consumptive,
personal, or household purposes, except a digital security or virtual
currency; and
2. Includes an open blockchain token that is intangible personal
property;
(c) "Digital security" means a digital asset that is a security, as defined in KRS
292.310; and
(d) "Virtual currency":
1. Means a digital asset, except an open blockchain token that is a digital
consumer asset, that is:
a. Used as a medium of exchange, unit of account, or store of
value; and
b. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, not
recognized as legal tender by the United States government or a
foreign government; and
2. Includes a virtual currency recognized as legal tender by a
government if the virtual currency existed and operated as a medium
of exchange before the currency was authorized or adopted by the
government.
(2) The definitions for "digital consumer asset," "digital security," and "virtual
currency" shall be mutually exclusive.
(3) For purposes of KRS 355.9-201(2), this chapter shall be considered an applicable
statute that establishes a different rule for consumers.
Page 5 of 21
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1400
(4) Notwithstanding any other law, nothing in this chapter shall apply to central
bank digital currency as defined in Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 355A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Digital assets are classified in the following manner:
(a) The following are intangible personal property:
1. A digital consumer asset;
2. A digital security; and
3. Virtual currency;
(b) For purposes of Article 9 of KRS Chapter 355 only:
1. A digital consumer asset shall be considered a general intangible, as
defined in KRS 355.9-102;
2. A digital security shall be considered investment property, as defined
in KRS 355.9-102; and
3. Notwithstanding KRS 355.1-201, virtual currency shall be considered
money; and
(c) For purposes of Article 8 of KRS Chapter 355 only, a digital security shall
be considered a security, as defined in KRS 355.8-102.
(2) (a) Consistent with KRS 355.8-102(1)(i), a digital asset may be treated as a
financial asset under that provision, in accordance with an agreement with
the owner of the digital asset.
(b) If a digital asset is treated as a financial asset under this subsection, the
digital asset shall remain classified as intangible personal property.
(3) A financial institution providing custodial services under Section 9 of this Act
shall be considered to meet the requirements of a securities intermediary, as
defined in KRS 355.8-102.
(4) Classification of digital assets under this section shall be construed to give the
Page 6 of 21
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1400
greatest effect to this chapter, but shall not apply to any other asset.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 355A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) As used in this section and Article 9 of KRS Chapter 355:
1. Consistent with KRS 355.9-314, "control" includes:
a. A secured party, or an agent, custodian, fiduciary, or trustee of
the secured party, that has complied with KRS 355.8-106,
including by means of:
i. A private key;
ii. The use of a multi-signature arrangement exclusive to the
secured party; or
iii. Any means substantially similar to the means described in
subpart i. or ii. of this subdivision; and
b. Use of a smart contract created by a secured party to comply with
KRS 355.8-106; and
2. Consistent with KRS 355.9-313, "possession":
a. Means the ability to exclude others from the use of property; and
b. Includes:
i. Use of a private key;
ii. Use of a multi-signature arrangement exclusive to the
secured party;
iii. Use of a smart contract;
iv. Use of a device that is substantially similar to a device
referenced in subpart i., ii., or iii. of this subdivision; and
v. Delivery of a certificated digital security, consistent with
KRS 355.8-301(1).
(b) As used in this section:
Page 7 of 21
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1400
1. "Multi-signature arrangement" means:
a. A system of access control relating to a digital asset for the
purpose of preventing unauthorized transactions relating to the
asset, in which two (2) or more private keys are required to
conduct a transaction; or
b. A system substantially similar to the system described in
subdivision a. of this subparagraph;
2. "Private key" means a unique element of cryptographic data, or any
substantially similar analogue, that is:
a. Held by a person;
b. Paired with a unique, publicly available element of
cryptographic data; and
c. Associated with an algorithm that is necessary to carry out an
encryption or decryption required to execute a transaction; and
3. "Smart contract" means:
a. An automated transaction, as defined in KRS 369.102; or
b. Any other similar transaction that is comprised of code, script, or
programming language that:
i. Executes the terms of an agreement; and
ii. May include taking custody of, and transferring, an asset
or issuing executable instructions based on the occurrence
or nonoccurrence of specified conditions.
(2) (a) Notwithstanding the financing statement requirement in KRS 355.9-310 as
otherwise applied to general intangibles or any other provision of law,
perfection of a security interest:
1. In virtual currency may be achieved through possession; and
2. In a digital security may be achieved by control.
Page 8 of 21
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1400
(b) A security interest held by a secured party having possession of virtual
currency, or control of a digital security, has priority over a security interest
held by a secured party that does not have possession or control, as
applicable.
(c) KRS 355.9-322(1)(a) and (2) shall not apply to the perfection and priority of
a security interest under this subsection.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, all other provisions of law
relating to perfection and priority of security interests, including KRS
355.9-322(3) and 355.9-207 and laws relating to priority of control over
delivery, shall apply to the perfection and priority of a security interest
under this subsection.
(3) (a) Before a secured party may take possession or control under this section,
the secured party shall enter into a security agreement with:
1. The debtor; and
2. As necessary, other parties.
(b) The security agreement may set forth the terms under which a secured party
may pledge its security interests as collateral for another transaction.
(c) Consistent with KRS 355.9-201(1), the security agreement shall be effective
according to its terms between the parties, against purchasers of collateral,
and against creditors.
(4) If a debtor is located in Kentucky, a secured party may file a financing statement
with the Secretary of State to perfect a security interest in a digital consumer
asset or a digital security, including to perfect a security interest in proceeds in
accordance with KRS 355.9-315(4).
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including Article 9 of KRS Chapter
355, a transferee takes a digital asset free of any security interest perfected by
filing two (2) years after the transferee takes the asset for value if the transferee
Page 9 of 21
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1400
does not have actual notice of an adverse claim at any time during the two (2)
year period.
(6) Perfection by possession creates a possessory security interest under KRS 355.9-
301(2) in virtual currency or a certificated digital security, based on the
possessory nature of a private key, or a device substantially similar to a private
key, which may be tangible or electronic.
(7) For purposes of Article 9 of KRS Chapter 355 and this subsection, if collateral is
required to be "located in a jurisdiction," a digital asset shall be located in
Kentucky if:
(a) The asset is possessed or controlled by:
1. A Kentucky financial institution; or
2. Another custodian in Kentucky;
(b) The debtor or secured party is physically located in Kentucky;
(c) The debtor or secured party is incorporated or organized in Kentucky; or
(d) A consideration of the following factors weighs in favor of finding that the
digital asset is located in Kentucky:
1. Whether a security agreement typically accompanying a possessory
security interest or other secured transaction exists, consistent with
KRS 355.9-201(1), including an agreement describing the possessory
nature of a private key or any device substantially similar to a private
key;
2. The choice of law in a security agreement, evidencing the intent and
understanding of the parties relating to a transaction, including
waivers of litigation in jurisdictions other than Kentucky, access to
Kentucky courts, and judicial economy; and
3. The relative clarity of the laws of other jurisdictions relating to a
digital asset, the consequences relating to unknown liens in those
Page 10 of 21
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1400
jurisdictions, and the ability of a court to exercise jurisdiction over a
particular digital asset.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 355A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Blockchain" means a digital ledger or database that is chronological,
consensus-based, decentralized, and mathematically verified in nature;
(b) "Consumptive":
1. Means a circumstance when a token is exchangeable for or provided
for the receipt of:
a. Services;
b. Software;
c. Content;
d. Real property; or
e. Tangible personal property; and
2. Includes rights of access to:
a. Services;
b. Content;
c. Real property; or
d. Tangible personal property;
(c) "Developer" means the person primarily responsible for:
1. Creating an open blockchain token, including by executing the
technological processes necessary to create the token; or
2. Otherwise designing an open blockchain token;
(d) "Facilitator" means a person who, as a business, makes open blockchain
tokens described in subsection (2) of this section available for resale to the
public after a token has been purchased by an initial buyer;
Page 11 of 21
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1400
(e) "Financial investment" means a contract, transaction, or arrangement
where a person invests money in a common enterprise and is led to expect
profits solely from the efforts of a promoter or a third party;
(f) "Open blockchain token":
1. Means a digital unit that is:
a. Created:
i. In response to the verification or collection of a specified
number of transactions relating to a digital ledger or
database;
ii. By deploying computer code to a digital ledger or database,
which may include a blockchain, that allows for the
creation of digital tokens or other units; or
iii. Using a combination of the methods specified in subparts i.
and ii. of this subdivision;
b. Recorded to a digital ledger or database, which may include a
blockchain; and
c. Capable of being traded or transferred between persons without
an intermediary or custodian of value; and
2. Does not include virtual currency or a digital security; and
(g) "Seller" means a person that makes an open blockchain token available for
purchase to an initial buyer.
(2) An open blockchain token with the following characteristics is intangible
personal property:
(a) The predominant purpose of the token is consumptive;
(b) The developer or seller did not market the token to the initial buyer as a
financial investment; and
(c) At least one (1) of the following is satisfied:
Page 12 of 21
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1400
1. The developer or seller reasonably believed that it sold the token to the
initial buyer for a consumptive purpose;
2. The token:
a. Has a consumptive purpose that is available at, or near, the time
of sale; and
b. Can be used at, or near, the time of sale for a consumptive
purpose;
3. The initial buyer of the token is prohibited by the developer or seller
from reselling the token until the token is available to be used for a
consumptive purpose; or
4. The developer or seller takes other reasonable precautions to prevent
an initial buyer from purchasing the token as a financial investment.
(3) (a) Before making an open blockchain token described in subsection (2) of this
section available for sale in this state, the developer or seller of the token, or
the registered agent of the developer or seller, shall:
1. Electronically file a notice of intent with the Secretary of State; and
2. Pay a filing fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000) to the Secretary of
State to offset the costs of administering this subsection.
(b) The notice of intent shall contain:
1. The name of the person acting as a developer or seller;
2. The contact information of the person filing the notice; and
3. Comprehensive details on the open blockchain token being made
available for sale, as required by the Secretary of State.
(c) Any forms required or promulgated under this subsection shall be:
1. Accessible to filers in a secure electronic format; and
2. Conspicuously posted on the Secretary of State's website.
(d) A developer, seller, and the registered agents of these persons, if applicable,
Page 13 of 21
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1400
shall have a continuing duty to update the contact information provided on
a notice of intent filed with the Secretary of State under this subsection as
long as the open blockchain token associated with the notice is actively
being sold.
(e) The Secretary of State shall prescribe, by administrative regulation
promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A:
1. The details required under paragraph (b)3. of this subsection;
2. The form in which a notice of intent under this subsection shall be
made and updated; and
3. The procedures applicable to filings made under this subsection.
(4) A facilitator shall:
(a) Before making any token available for resale to the public in this state,
confirm with the Secretary of State that a notice of intent has been filed for
the token in accordance with subsection (3) of this section;
(b) At all times, have a reasonable and good faith belief that a token subject to
resale by the facilitator conforms to the requirements of subsection (2) of
this section; and
(c) Take reasonably prompt action to terminate the resale of a token that does
not conform to the requirements of this section.
(5) (a) A willful failure by a developer, seller, or facilitator to comply with the
duties imposed under this section shall be deemed an act or practice in
violation of KRS 367.170.
(b) All of the remedies, powers, and duties delegated to the Attorney General by
KRS 367.110 to 367.300, and the penalties provided in KRS 367.990,
pertaining to acts and practices declared unlawful by KRS 367.170, shall be
applicable to a willful failure referenced in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) A developer, seller, or facilitator is subject to all applicable criminal
Page 14 of 21
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1400
statutes, including the fraud provisions of KRS Chapter 434.
(6) The Secretary of State may refer the following to appropriate state or federal
agencies for investigation, criminal prosecution, civil penalties, and other
appropriate enforcement actions:
(a) Suspected violations of this section; and
(b) The developer, seller, or facilitator of an open blockchain token, or another
digital asset that substantially resembles an open blockchain token, which,
in the determination of the Secretary of State, is being sold for any
fraudulent purposes.
(7) This section may be cited as the Kentucky Utility Token Act.
SECTION 8. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 355A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Subject to other jurisdictional limits placed on specific courts under Kentucky law, the
courts of Kentucky shall have jurisdiction to hear claims in both law and equity
relating to digital assets, including those arising under this chapter, KRS Chapter 355,
and Section 9 of this Act.
SECTION 9. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 2 OF KRS CHAPTER 286 IS
CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Custodial services":
1. Means the safekeeping, servicing, and management of customer
currency and digital assets; and
2. Includes:
a. The exercise of fiduciary and trust powers involving the exercise
of discretion;
b. Fund administration; and
c. The execution of customer instructions;
Page 15 of 21
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1400
(b) "Digital asset" has the same meaning as in Section 4 of this Act; and
(c) "Financial institution" means any bank, trust company, credit union, or
special purpose depository institution that is:
1. Chartered under this chapter; and
2. Authorized to act as a fiduciary and engage in trust business.
(2) (a) A financial institution may provide custodial services in accordance with
this section upon providing sixty (60) days written notice to the
commissioner.
(b) This section shall not be deemed exclusive, but shall be construed as an
optional framework for enhanced supervision of digital asset custody.
(c) If a financial institution elects to provide custodial services under this
section, it shall comply with all provisions of this section.
(3) A financial institution may serve:
(a) As a qualified custodian, as specified in 17 C.F.R. sec. 275.206(4)-2;
(b) As a custodian authorized by the United States Commodity Futures Trading
Commission; or
(c) As a custodian authorized under any other law.
(4) In performing custodial services under this section, a financial institution shall:
(a) Implement all accounting, account statement, internal control, notice, and
other standards specified by applicable state and federal law and
regulations for custodial services;
(b) 1. Maintain information technology best practices relating to digital
assets held in custody.
2. The commissioner may specify required best practices under this
paragraph through the promulgation of an administrative regulation;
(c) Fully comply with applicable state and federal anti-money laundering,
customer identification, and beneficial ownership requirements; and
Page 16 of 21
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1400
(d) Take other actions necessary to carry out this section, which may include:
1. Exercising fiduciary powers; and
2. Ensuring compliance with federal law governing digital assets
classified as commodities.
(5) (a) A financial institution providing custodial services under this section shall
conform to the audit, accounting, and related requirements specified by the
commissioner and applicable law, which may include entering into an
agreement with an independent public accountant to conduct an
examination conforming to the requirements of 17 C.F.R. sec. 275.206(4)-
2(a)(4) and (6), at the cost of the financial institution.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, an accountant shall
transmit the results of any examination conducted under this subsection to
the commissioner within one hundred twenty (120) days of the examination
and may file the results with other regulatory agencies as their rules may
provide.
(c) Material discrepancies in an examination shall be reported to the
commissioner within one (1) day.
(d) The commissioner shall review examination results within a reasonable
time of receipt and during any regular examination.
(6) Digital assets held in custody under this section are not depository liabilities or
assets of the financial institution.
(7) A financial institution, or a subsidiary, may register as an investment adviser,
investment company, or broker dealer, as necessary.
(8) A financial institution shall:
(a) Maintain possession or control, as applicable, over a digital asset while in
custody; and
(b) Require each customer to elect, pursuant to a written agreement with the
Page 17 of 21
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1400
financial institution, one (1) of the following relationships for each digital
asset in custody:
1. Custody under a bailment as a nonfungible or fungible asset. Assets
held under this subparagraph shall be strictly segregated from other
assets; or
2. Custody as provided in subsection (9) of this section.
(9) (a) If a customer so elects, the financial institution may, based only on the
customer's instructions, undertake transactions with the digital asset.
(b) A financial institution is deemed to maintain possession or control in
accordance with subsection (8)(a) of this section by entering into an
agreement with the counterparty to a transaction that contains a time for
return of the asset and other customary terms in securities or commodities
transactions.
(c) The financial institution shall not be liable for any loss suffered with
respect to a transaction under this subsection, except for liability consistent
with fiduciary and trust powers.
(10) (a) A financial institution and a customer shall agree to the following, in
writing:
1. The source code version the financial institution will use for each
digital asset; and
2. The treatment of each asset under the Uniform Commercial Code,
KRS Chapter 355, if applicable.
(b) Any ambiguity as to the agreement reached under paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall be resolved in favor of the customer.
(11) A financial institution shall provide clear, written notice to each customer, and
require written acknowledgment, of the following:
(a) Prior to implementation, any material source code updates relating to
Page 18 of 21
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1400
digital assets held in custody, except in emergencies that may include
security vulnerabilities;
(b) The heightened risk of loss from transactions referred to in subsection (9)
of this section;
(c) That some risk of loss as a pro rata creditor exists as the result of custody:
1. Under a bailment as a fungible asset; or
2. As provided in subsection (9) of this section;
(d) That custody as provided in subsection (9) of this section may not result in
the digital assets of the customer being strictly segregated from other
customer assets; and
(e) That the financial institution is not liable for losses suffered with respect to
a transaction referred to in subsection (9) of this section, except for liability
consistent with fiduciary and trust powers.
(12) (a) A financial institution and a customer shall agree in writing to a time period
within which the financial institution will return a digital asset held in
custody under this section.
(b) If a customer makes an election under subsection (9) of this section, the
financial institution and the customer may also agree in writing to the form
in which the digital asset shall be returned.
(13) (a) All ancillary or subsidiary proceeds relating to digital assets held in custody
under this section shall accrue to the benefit of the customer, except as
specified by a written agreement with the customer.
(b) The financial institution may elect not to collect certain ancillary or
subsidiary proceeds, as long as the election is disclosed in writing.
(c) A customer that elects custody under a bailment as a nonfungible or
fungible asset may withdraw the digital asset in a form that permits the
collection of the ancillary or subsidiary proceeds.
Page 19 of 21
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1400
(14) For digital assets held in custody under this section, a financial institution shall
not:
(a) Authorize, or permit, rehypothecation of the digital assets; or
(b) Engage in any activity to use, or exercise, discretionary authority relating to
a digital asset, except based on customer instructions.
(15) A financial institution shall not take any action that may be authorized under this
section if that action would likely impair the solvency, or the safety and
soundness, of the financial institution, as determined by the commissioner after
considering the nature of custodial services customary in the banking and
finance industry.
(16) To offset the costs of supervision and administration under this section, a
financial institution that elects to provide custodial services in accordance with
this section shall pay a supervision fee established by the commissioner through
the promulgation of an administrative regulation in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A.
SECTION 10. A NEW SECTION OF ARTICLE 1 OF KRS CHAPTER 355 IS
CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
KRS Chapter 355A and Section 9 of this Act shall be construed as supplemental to the
provisions of this chapter. In the event of a conflict, the provisions of KRS Chapter
355A and Section 9 of this Act shall control.
Section 11. KRS 369.103 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, KRS 369.101 to
369.120 applies to electronic records and electronic signatures relating to a
transaction, including transactions involving digital assets, as defined in Section 4
of this Act.
(2) KRS 369.101 to 369.120 does not apply to a transaction to the extent it is governed
by:
Page 20 of 21
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1400
(a) A law governing the creation and execution of wills, codicils, or testamentary
trusts;
(b) KRS Chapter 355 other than KRS 355.1-107 and 355.1-206, and Articles 2
and 2A of KRS Chapter 355; and
(c) A law governing the creation or transfer of any negotiable instrument or any
instrument establishing title or an interest in title to a motor vehicle and
governed by KRS Chapter 186 or 186A.
(3) KRS 369.101 to 369.120 applies to an electronic record or electronic signature
otherwise excluded from the application of KRS 369.101 to 369.120 under
subsection (2) of this section to the extent it is governed by a law other than those
specified in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) A transaction subject to KRS 369.101 to 369.120 is also subject to other applicable
substantive law.
Section 12. KRS 355.1-102 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, this article applies to a
transaction to the extent that it is governed by another article of the Uniform
Commercial Code.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law, nothing in KRS Chapter 355 shall apply to
central bank digital currency as defined in Section 1 of this Act.
Section 13. The Secretary of State and the commissioner of financial
institutions shall promulgate administrative regulations to implement the provisions of
Section 7 and 9 of this Act, as applicable, on or before October 1, 2025.
Section 14. Sections 4 to 11 of this Act take effect on October 1, 2025.
Page 21 of 21
XXXX 2/3/2025 1:21 PM Jacketed